hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GAHPIR !Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ; ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N:%> MALLAS- ;		! GAI, NPx, NPl
 +N: DenominalNounsC ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsCShort ;
 +N:%>X2 GEAHTES ;

LEXICON GAHPIRLONGSHORT !Long and short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N:%>X7 MALES ;		! This gives boagan# and boagán#
 +N:%> MALLAS- ;		! GAI, NPx, NPl
 +N: DenominalNounsC ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsC ;
 +N:%>X2 GEAHTES ;

LEXICON GAHPIRLONG !Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ; ! gahpirgánda, čoahkkinordnet
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»#viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»#viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N:%> MALLAS- ;		! GAI, NPx, NPl
 +N: DenominalNounsC ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsCLong ;
 +N:%>X2 GEAHTES ;

LEXICON DAIVVAS !Tris. Gradating C-Nouns, The Troms declension: dáivvaš:dáivaha, bearaš:bearraha, njunuš:njunnoha
 +N:š%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +N:š%>X4 R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:h%>X2 PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen:h%>X2a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:h%>X2 K ; !SUB
 +N+SgGenCmp:h%>X2a R ; !compound also for these
 +N+SgGenCmp:h%>X2 R ; !SUB !compound also for these
 +N+Sg+Gen:h%>X2 PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:h%>X2a K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:h%>X2 K ; !SUB
 +N+Sg+Acc:h%>X2 PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:h%>X2at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:h%>X2ak K ; !SUB
 +N+Sg+Ill:h%>X2asa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:h%>X2ijddá Px1V ; !^P^
 +N:h%>X2i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
 +N:š%>X4 DenominalAdjsCLong ;
 +N:h%>X2 DenominalNounsC ;
 +N:h%>X2 GEAHTES ;



! What about Trisyll. Non-Gradating 0-Nouns ??? Are there some?
! Yes there are: "kamela" is one of them, and in corp the
! Pl Gen PxSg3 is kamelaiddis. Right or wrong?
! So, where to put this? STAHTA seems to be wrong place for it.

! Contracted nouns
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON BOAZU !Anim. Contracted 0-Nouns
 SUOLU ;

LEXICON SUOLU !Short compound-forms. Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns
 +N:%>X4 BOAZU-NE ;
 +N:%>X8 MALES ;
 +N:%>Y5 BOHCCO ;
 +N:%>Y6 BOHCCU ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON SUOLULONG !Long compound-forms. Inanim. Contracted 0-Nouns
 +N+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Der/viđá+Adv:»X4viđá K ;
! +N+Der/viđi+Adv:»X4viđi K ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +N+Ess:%>X4n PxC ; !^P^
 +N:%>X5 MALES ;
 +N:%>Y5 BOHCCO ;
 +N:%>Y6 BOHCCU ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Long ;


!LEXICON SATTU
! +N:%>Y5 SADDO ;
! +N:%>Y6 SADDU ;
! +N:%>X4 SATTU- ;
! +N: DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GISTTA !The Noun gistta, gist -
 +N:s'ta%>X4 BOAZU-NE ;
 +N:stá%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:stá%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:stta DenominalAdjsV1 ;

LEXICON FALIS !Contracted Anim. C-Nouns
 +N:%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +N:%>X7 MALES ;
 +N:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON LASIS !Contracted Inanim. C-Nouns
!Tentatively copying entries from FALIS
!This must be checked! 020207 TT.
 +N:%>X4 MALIS0 ;
 +N:%>X7 MALES ;
 +N:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N: DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON GUOVTTIS ! Collective numerals
 +N+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +N+Num:%>X2 MALLAS- ; !XXX tentative
 +N+Num:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
!Guovttis doesn't have an essive.

LEXICON GUOVTTU !Here because other lexicons don't fit for it
 +N+Sg+Nom:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:kto%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:kto PxV2 ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ovtto PxV2 ; !^P^
 +N+SgGenCmp:kto%> R ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:ovtto%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:kto%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:kto PxV2 ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc:ovtto%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:ovtto PxV2 ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:ktu%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:kto%>s PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:kto%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:kto%>n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:kto%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:ovtto%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:ovtto%>s K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Loc:ovtto%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:ktu%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:ovttu%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:kto%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:ovtto%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:ovttu%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:ktu%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ovttu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ovttu%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:ktu%>X5jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ktu%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:ovttu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:ovttu%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:ktu%>X5jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:ktu%>X5jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:ktu%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ktu%>jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:ovttu%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ovttu%>jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:ovttu%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ovttu%>js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:ovttu%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:ktu%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:ktu%>js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Loc:ktu%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:ktu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:ktu%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:ovttu%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:ovttu%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^


LEXICON GARGIA
! light fin syll, bisyll. on -o- that doesn't have change o:u in front of j (i): Kino
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>i K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;
 +N+Ess:%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>id9 K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>id9 R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>id9 K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:%>igujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>sa PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:%>in PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>id Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>id PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>id PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>idas PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>in PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:%>id PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible



LEXICON BUFFALO
 !heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:a%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 
LEXICON ESSAYA !recent loanwords on vow+a
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc: PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:a%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:a%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:a%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:a%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV2 ;


LEXICON MASAI
 !heavy fin syll
 !gen = -a ill = -ii
 !parallel to NYSTØ
 +N+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +N+SgGenCmp:a%>X7 R ; !SUB
 +N+SgGenCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:i%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:a%>jd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Acc: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa PxA ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Ess:a%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalNounsV ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsV2 ;


LEXICON KULTUR !Recent loanwords on -vra with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:r%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:v'ra%> R ;	!SUB
 +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:v'ra Px3V ; !^P^
 +N:v'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:v'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:v'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:v'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON KANTUR
 +N+SgNomCmp:ántor%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:antuv'ra%> R ; !SUB
 +N+Sg+Nom:antuv'ra%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:antuv'ra Px3V ; !^P^
 +N:antuv'ra%> EssV ;
 +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:antuv'ra%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:antuv'ra DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON MASKIN !Recent loanwords on -iidna with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:in%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:ijdna%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ijdna%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:ijdna Px3V ; !^P^
 +N:ijdna%> EssV ;
 +N:ijdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:ijdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:ijdna DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON TELEFON !Recent loanwords on -vdna with short cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:n%> R ;
 +N+SgNomCmp:vdna%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:vdna%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:vdna Px3V ; !^P^
 +N:vdna%> EssV ;
 +N:vdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:vdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:vdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:vdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:vdna DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON SOSIAL !Recent loanwords on -ála with both short and long cmp-form
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ; !SUB
 +N+SgNomCmp:a%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:a Px3V ; !^P^
 +N:a%> EssV ;
 +N:a%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! +N:a%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 +N:a DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 +N:a DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 +N:a DenominalNounsV ;

! Miscellaneous noun types
! - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON OLLUVUOHTA !Exceptional vuohta-Nouns
 +N: VUOHTAMORPH ; !^B^ vuohtamorph it is

LEXICON MAGASH
 +N+SgNomCmp:%>X7 R ;
 +N+Ess:%>in K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%> K ; !SUB
 +N+Sg+Gen: PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá Px1V ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +N+PlGenCmp:%>ijd R ;
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijs K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás PxC ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni PxV ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijddi PxPlComV1 ; !^P^


LEXICON EGEZHAGAT
 +N+SgNomCmp:%> R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%>X4 K ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:a%>X4 Px1V ; !^P^
 +N+Pl+Nom:a%>X4t K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +N+Ess:a%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +N:a%>X5 EGEZHAHKII ;

LEXICON EGEZHAHKII
 +Pl+Nom:jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jd PxPlComC ; !^P^
